Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-504
Publication, defined.

Wherever the term publication is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573 and no manner specified therefor, it shall be taken to mean once a week three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county wherein such publication is to be made. It shall not be necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three weeks, but not less than fourteen days (excluding the day of the first publication), shall intervene between the first publication and the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the date of the last publication.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(2), p. 524.